Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1122
Act; how construed.

The Securities Act of Nebraska shall be construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it and to coordinate the interpretation and administration of the act with the related federal regulation.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 22, p. 1797;

Laws 1998, LB 894, § 6.